Hawaii statutes.
[§707-733.6]
Continuous sexual assault of a minor under the age of fourteen years. (1)
A person commits the offense of continuous sexual assault of a minor under the
age of fourteen years if the person:

(a) Either resides in the same home with a minor
under the age of fourteen years or has recurring access to the minor; and

(b) Engages in three or more acts of sexual
penetration or sexual contact with the minor over a period of time, while the
minor is under the age of fourteen years.

(2) To convict
under this section, the trier of fact, if a jury, need unanimously agree only
that the requisite number of acts have occurred; the jury need not agree on
which acts constitute the requisite number.

(3) No other felony
sex offense involving the same victim may be charged in the same proceeding
with a charge under this section, unless the other charged offense occurred
outside the period of the offense charged under this section, or the other
offense is charged in the alternative. A defendant may be charged with only
one count under this section, unless more than one victim is involved, in which
case a separate count may be charged for each victim.

(4) Continuous
sexual assault of a minor under the age of fourteen years is a class A felony.
[L 2006, c 60, §1]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next